GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/rank_compounds.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
#
# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	add ranking markers for compounds
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller
# DATE:		04-Oct-2005
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: 	fst -utf8 -l [Thisfile]
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------



# compound markers
define CPD   ["^#" | "^-" | %+Cpd ];


read regex [ 
# mark verba stems
# e.g.	Bergfahrt       bergen  +Verb^#Fahrt+Noun+Fem+Sg+NomAccDatGen
# 	Bergfahrt       Berg    +Noun+Masc+Sg^#Fahrt+Noun+Fem+Sg+NomAccDatGen
	[..] -> %+Filter2	|| %+Verb CPD ?* _ .#.

# mark nominal infinitives
# e.g.	Tastendruck     tasten  +Verb+Inf^]+Noun+Neut+Sg^#Druck+Noun+Masc+Sg+NomAccDat
#	Tastendruck     Taste   +Noun+Fem+Pl^#Druck+Noun+Masc+Sg+NomAccDat

.o.	[..] -> %+Filter3	|| %+Verb %+Inf "^]" %+Noun %+Neut %+Sg CPD ?* _ .#.

# mark present participles
# e.g.	Tastendruck     tasten  +Verb+PPres^]+Adj+Pos^#Ruck+Noun+Masc+Sg+NomAccDat
.o.	[..] -> %+Filter4	|| %+Verb %+PPres "^]" %+Adj %+Pos ?* _ .#.

].i;
